Louisiana, session 2026, SB345.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 15:933.2 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§933.2. Office of juvenile justice; annual report to the legislature
The secretary of the office of juvenile justice shall submit an annual
report on or before February first of each year to the Senate Committee on
Judiciary B, the House Committee on Administration of Criminal Justice, and
the David R. Poynter Legislative Research Library pursuant to R.S. 24:771 and
772. The report shall, at a minimum, include the following information:
(1) Prevention and intervention programs available to juveniles,
including school and community-based programs.
(2) Development of diversion programs with expanded eligibility.
(3) For juveniles in the custody of the office of juvenile justice, access to
educational resources and physical and mental health resources, including but
not limited to assessments and treatment.
(4)(a) The number of juveniles in the custody of the office of juvenile
justice delineated by age of juvenile and facility.
(b) The number of complaints received by the office of juvenile justice
from a juvenile in the custody of the office or his family delineated by type of
complaint and facility.
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 345 ENROLLED
(c) The number of investigations conducted due to a reported complaint
delineated by status of investigation, resolution, and facility.
(d) The number of lawsuits delineated by case number and status.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.